test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-maadd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - maadd â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     maadd+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: maadd
     maadd+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: maddi
     maadd+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: maddi
     maadd+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: maddja
     maadd+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: maddjest
     maadd+N+Sg+Com+Indef: maddjin
     maadd+N+Ess+Indef: maddjen
     maadd+N+Par+Indef: madded
     maadd+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [madditaa, madditää]
     maadd+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: maddi
     maadd+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: maddji
     maadd+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: maddjid
     maadd+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: maddjid
     maadd+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: maddjin
     maadd+N+Pl+Com+Indef: maddjivuiʹm
     maadd+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [maddjitaa, maddjitää]
